North Carolina, session 2025, HB156.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. G.S. 58-50-130(a)(5) reads as rewritten:
"(5) No small employer carrier, insurer, subsidiary of an insurer, or controlled
individual of an insurance holding company shall provide stop loss,
catastrophic, or reinsurance coverage to small employers who employ fewer
than 12 five eligible employees that does not comply with the underwriting,
rating, and other applicable standards in this Act. An insurer shall not issue a
stop loss health insurance policy to any person, firm, corporation, partnership,
or association defined as a small employer that does any of the following:
a. Provides direct coverage of health expenses payable to an individual.
b. Has an annual attachment point for claims incurred per individual that
is lower than twenty thousand dollars ($20,000) for plan years
beginning in 2013. For subsequent policy years, the amount shall be
indexed using the Consumer Price Index for Medical Services for All
Urban Consumers for the South Region and shall be rounded to the
nearest whole thousand dollars. The index factor shall be the index as
of July of the year preceding the change divided by the index as of July
2012.
c. Has an annual aggregate attachment point lower than the greater of
one of the following:
1. One hundred twenty percent (120%) of expected claims.
2. Twenty thousand dollars ($20,000) for plan years beginning in
2013. For subsequent policy years, the amount shall be indexed
using the Consumer Price Index for Medical Services for All
Urban Consumers for the South Region and shall be rounded
to the nearest whole thousand dollars. The index factor shall be
the index as of July of the year preceding the change divided
by the index as of July 2012.
Nothing in this subsection prohibits an insurer from providing additional
incentives to small employers with benefits promoting a medical home or
benefits that provide health care screenings, are focused on outcomes and key
*H156-v-1*

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
performance indicators, or are reimbursed on an outcomes basis rather than a
fee-for-service basis."
SECTION 2. This act becomes effective October 1, 2025, and applies to contracts
issued, renewed, or amended on or after that date.
Page 2 House Bill 156-First Edition